Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1916
Installation; repair; permit required.

No sanitary plumbing shall be installed or repaired in any building except a single-family dwelling or a farm or ranch structure by any person, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity without a permit issued by the city or village nearest the construction site.

Laws 1969, c. 100, § 2, p. 475;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 140.